Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Cities of First Class

173.010.
Public library in cities of first class — Arrangement with existing libraries — Provisions of contract.

The mayor of any city of the first class, with the consent of the city legislative body, may contract with the governing authority of any library in the city, containing fifty thousand (50,000) or more volumes, for the purpose of making the library free and open to the public at reasonable times and under reasonable regulations to be determined by the governing authority of the library.

The contract shall be for not over five (5) years and may be renewed. The contract shall provide that the uses, privileges and facilities of the library, subject to the reasonable regulation of its governing body, shall be equal and free to all persons; that it shall be nonsectarian; and that its reading rooms, and its circulating department shall be maintained free and open to the general public.

History.

2801a-1.

173.020.
Tax for existing library — Report to mayor.

Any city acting under the provisions of KRS

173.010

shall annually, in its annual ordinance fixing the tax rate, include a levy for library purposes not exceeding two cents ($0.02) on each one hundred dollars ($100) worth of property assessed for taxation for city purposes. The amount levied annually shall be credited to the library fund of the city, and the revenue, as collected, shall be paid over to the governing authority of the library by the director of finance in regular weekly installments.

All money so received shall be used exclusively for conducting and maintaining the library for the public purposes mentioned in KRS

173.010

. The governing authority of the library shall make a report to the mayor each September, showing statistics covering the attendance at and the use of the books of the library, the receipts and expenditures of all money handled by it during the year, and other information bearing upon the usefulness of the library to the public.

History.

2801a-2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Expenditure not to exceed revenue; use of money limited to purpose for which collected, KRS

68.110

,

68.990

.

Ordinance fixing tax rate in cities of the first class, KRS

91.280

.

173.030.
Establishment of free public library in cities of first class — Use of — Ordinances regarding conduct.

Any city of the first class may, by ordinance, establish and maintain within its corporate limits a free public library, with circulating and reference departments and reading rooms, or any of them, for the use of the residents thereof, with such branches and stations as the board of trustees of the library think proper. All the uses and privileges of such library shall be free and equal to all residents of the city, subject only to the rules and regulations established by the board of trustees. The board may extend the privilege and use of the library to persons residing outside of the city, upon such terms and conditions as the board prescribes.

The city legislative body may pass such ordinances as the board recommends providing for the punishment of persons injuring the library property and regulating the conduct of persons using the library.

History.

2801b-1, 2801b-2, 2801b-8.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The board of trustees of the Louisville free public library has the authority under this section to participate in the state’s library communications network pilot project.

OAG 70-773

.

The library board of trustees has the authority under subsection (1) of this section to establish a program whereby residents of adjacent counties are permitted to use its facilities and services in return for reciprocal use of their library and facilities.

OAG 75-695

.

173.040.
Board of trustees — Officers and employees.

As soon as practicable after the passage of the ordinance providing for a free public library, the mayor shall appoint twelve (12) trustees. The appointments shall be made for four (4) year terms except that the original appointees shall be so appointed that the terms of three (3) members shall expire each year. Each appointee must be, at the time of his appointment, a taxpayer and qualified voter in the city and must have resided therein for two (2) years prior to his appointment. The mayor shall continue to appoint all twelve (12) trustees unless the county judge/executive becomes authorized to appoint trustees under the provisions of KRS

173.105

, after which the mayor shall appoint only the trustee positions not appointed by the county judge/executive. The trustees shall serve without compensation. The twelve (12) trustees, whether appointed under this subsection or under KRS

173.105

, together with the mayor of the city, shall constitute the board of trustees of the free public library, and shall be a corporation with power to make such rules and regulations to govern itself and the property entrusted to its care as it deems proper. Absence of a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee’s term shall constitute automatic resignation from the board by the trustee.

Vacancies in the office of trustee shall be reported by the board to the mayor, if the vacancy occurs in a trustee position filled by appointment of the mayor, or to the county judge/executive if the vacancy occurs in a trustee position which the county judge/executive has authority to fill under KRS

173.105

. The vacancy shall be filled by the mayor if so authorized or the county judge/executive if so authorized under subsection (1) of this section and KRS

173.105

, for the remainder of an unexpired term or for a full term if the vacancy results from the expiration of a term. The trustees shall, before entering upon the duties of office, make an oath or affirmation before a judicial officer that they will discharge their duties.

At its first meeting and each year thereafter, the board shall select members of the board to serve as president and vice president, and it may choose other necessary officers and employees, fix their duties and compensation, and remove them at pleasure.

History.

2801b-3, 2801b-4; amend. Acts 1978, ch. 267, § 1, effective March 30, 1978; 1982, ch. 245, § 8, effective July 15, 1982.

173.045.
Retirement plan for employees.

The board of trustees of the free public libraries in cities of the first class, created or existing under the laws of Kentucky, which have not less than two (2) full time employees, may provide for their retirement with annuities; may adopt the American Library Association retirement plan or make such other provisions for retirement of its employees as the board deems proper, whether similar to the American Library Association retirement plan or otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 197, § 5.

173.050.
Powers of board of trustees.

The board of trustees may, in its corporate name:

Contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, and have and use a corporate seal, which it may alter at pleasure;

Acquire, by itself or jointly with the city in which the library is located, by gift, purchase or otherwise, and hold, in the same manner, real and personal property to the use of the public library, for the purpose for which it is dedicated;

Use, manage and improve, sell and convey, rent or lease property, and erect suitable buildings.

The board of trustees may mortgage any real or personal property owned by the library to secure any sums borrowed for making repairs or improvements, or paying off any indebtedness it may owe. The mortgage shall not exceed $1,000,000.

History.

2801b-3, 2801b-7; amend. Acts 1946, ch. 197, § 1.

173.060.
Meetings of board — Incurring of liabilities.

The board shall meet at least once each month for the transaction of its business. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum, but no appropriation of money, except for ordinary or current expenditures, shall be made without the affirmative vote of a majority of its members. Except for the purpose of erecting the library building, the board of trustees shall not incur liabilities for any current year in excess of its annual income, including gifts and donations and unexpended balances from previous years.

History.

2801b-4.

173.065.
Fiscal year of library.

The fiscal year of the free public libraries in cities of the first class shall begin on the first day of July of each year and end on June 30 next following.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 197, § 4.

173.070.
Appropriation for public library — Disposition of revenue — Report to legislative body.

In order to provide funds for the establishment and maintenance of a library established as provided in KRS

173.030

, the legislative body of a city of the first class shall annually appropriate from the general fund of the city such sum as in the judgment of the legislative body shall be reasonably necessary for such purposes. Moneys so appropriated shall be credited to the library fund of the city, and may be paid over to the board of trustees by the director of finance of such city in regular monthly installments.

The board shall make a report to the city legislative body each July, showing the use of the library for the fiscal year ending the last day of June preceding, the receipts and expenditures of all money handled by it during the year, and giving such other information as may promote the usefulness of the library to the public, or as is called for by the city legislative body. No portion of the property or fund held for library purposes under this section shall ever be applied to the support of any library not exclusively under the control of the board of trustees.

History.

2801b-6; amend. Acts 1946, ch. 197, § 2; 1954, ch. 164, § 7.

173.080.
Issuance of library bonds.

The board of trustees may, in its discretion, issue bonds in the sum of not over one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the purpose of making improvements or repairs, or paying off any indebtedness it may owe. The bonds may be secured by any or all real or personal property owned by the library. The bonds shall be designated as “library bonds” and the board of trustees shall, by resolution, fix the date and maturity of the bonds, the rate of interest and form they shall bear, and where they shall be payable. The board shall determine when, at what price and how the bonds shall be sold. As the bonds are sold their proceeds shall be placed in some bank, but shall be kept in a separate account and shall be used only for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, provided however the expense and cost of floating the bonds may be paid therefrom. The rent received in any year from any real property belonging to the board of trustees shall be first applied to the payment of interest on bonds for such year, and next to the sinking fund requirements of the bond issue for such year, and the balance may be used for current operating expenses of the board of trustees.

History.

2801b-9; amend. Acts 1946, ch. 197, § 3.

173.090.
City may guarantee library bonds.

If bonds are issued as provided in KRS

173.030

to

173.100

, the city in which the library is located may, by ordinance, guarantee the bonds, either as to principal or interest or both.

When the ordinance guaranteeing the bonds is enacted by the city, the bonds shall be indorsed “guaranteed” and the name of the city attached and the guarantee shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the director of finance, and stamped with the proper seal of the city.

History.

2801b-10.

173.100.
Deposit of library funds.

All money due the board shall be deposited in a bank, in the city, selected by the board, and funds shall be withdrawn from the bank only on order of the board by check of its treasurer countersigned by its president.

History.

2801b-5.

173.105.
Contract with county — Support by county — Effect of compact — Effect on joint department upon establishment of consolidated local government.

The fiscal court of any county containing a population of over two hundred thousand (200,000) and a city of the first class, may contract with the board of trustees of the free public library of any such city for the purpose of granting to the residents and schools of such county the same privileges afforded by such library to residents and schools in the city.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, when the fiscal court of any county containing a population of over two hundred thousand (200,000) and a city of the first class have in effect a compact under KRS

79.310

to

79.330

, the city and county shall by joint action create a joint city/county department for the purpose of providing a free public library. In such event, the board of trustees shall be dissolved as a corporate entity, and all assets and liabilities of the board of trustees shall be transferred to the joint department. An advisory board may be established by joint agreement of such city and county. Upon the establishment of a consolidated local government in a county where a city of the first class and a county containing that city have had in effect a cooperative compact pursuant to KRS

79.310

to

79.330

, the joint department shall become a department of the consolidated local government and all assets and liabilities of the joint department shall be transferred to the consolidated local government. An advisory board may be established or maintained by a consolidated local government. Members of the advisory board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of KRS

67C.139

and shall serve at the pleasure of the mayor of the consolidated local government.

If the fiscal court enters into a contract pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, then the county judge/executive shall have the authority to appoint one-half (1/2) of the positions on the board of trustees of the free public library. Appointments shall be made for four (4) year terms. Each appointee must be at the time of his or her appointment a taxpayer and qualified voter in the county.

The county judge/executive shall make the appointments authorized by subsection (3) of this section in the following manner. On March 31 of 1978 and March 31 of 1980, he or she shall appoint persons to fill two (2) of the vacancies which occur. On March 31 of 1979 and March 31 of 1981, he or she shall appoint a person to fill one (1) vacancy which occurs. He or she shall continue to make the appointments to these positions when a vacancy occurs or a term expires, subject to subsection (5) of this section.

If the contract between the fiscal court and a free public library terminates or ceases to be in effect, the county judge/executive shall no longer have the authority to appoint persons as trustees to the board of the free public library and the mayor may terminate the appointment of trustees appointed by the county judge/executive and appoint persons to fill their unexpired terms.

The fiscal court may annually appropriate money out of the county treasury to the maintenance and support of the library.

Money so appropriated by the fiscal court may be expended by the board of trustees of the free public library in the establishment of branch stations in the county outside the city of the first class, under regulations of the board of trustees.

History.

2801c-1, 2801c-2; amend. Acts 1978, ch. 267, § 2, effective March 30, 1978; 1986, ch. 77, § 21, effective July 15, 1986; 2002, ch. 346, § 178, effective July 15, 2002.

173.106.
Opportunity for voluntary contribution for free public library when registering vehicle in county with compact in effect — Procedure upon establishment of consolidated local government.

In a county where the county and a city of the first class have in effect a compact under KRS

79.310

to

79.330

and have created a joint city/county library department, the county clerk, when he or she receives an application for vehicle registration pursuant to KRS

186.030

, shall present the person making the application an opportunity to make a voluntary contribution for the support of the free public library. If the applicant chooses to donate to the library, he or she shall include the donation in the fee. The clerk shall pay the donations to the library department in the same fashion as taxes are paid pursuant to KRS

134.815

and shall be entitled to the same commission as that payable on county taxes pursuant to KRS

134.805

. Upon the establishment of a consolidated local government in a county where a city of the first class and a county containing that city have had in effect a cooperative compact pursuant to KRS

79.310

to

79.330

, and have created a joint city/county library department, the county clerk shall continue the procedure by which persons may make voluntary contributions for the support of the free public library. The donations shall be transferred to the consolidated local government for the maintenance of the library department in the same manner as moneys are transferred pursuant to KRS

134.815

and the county clerk shall be entitled to the same commission as that payable on taxes pursuant to KRS

134.805

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 100, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 346, § 179, effective July 15, 2002.

173.107.
Library tax or appropriation not to be decreased when city becomes city of first class or consolidated local government.

Any library established or maintained pursuant to the provisions of KRS

173.310

to

173.410

shall not, upon becoming a city of the first class, or a consolidated local government, or a county containing a city of the first class, have its tax levy or appropriation decreased except by the procedure in KRS

173.790

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 223, § 6; 2002, ch. 346, § 180, effective July 15, 2002.